Hawaii statutes.
[§501-261.5] Deregistration of
registered land other than fee time share interests. [Section repealed
December 31, 2016. L 2014, c 47, §3.] The registered owner of the fee
interest in registered land may submit a written request to the assistant registrar
to deregister the land under this chapter.

(1) Any written request for deregistration shall
include proof of title insurance in the amount of the value of the land to be
deregistered and a written waiver of all claims against the State relating to
the title to the land arising after the date of deregistration.

(2) Upon presentation to the assistant registrar of a
written request for deregistration by the registered owner of the fee interest
in registered land, the assistant registrar shall not register the same, but
shall:

(A) Record in the bureau of conveyances,
pursuant to chapter 502, the current certificate of title for the fee interest
in the registered land; provided that prior thereto, the assistant registrar
shall note on the certificate of title all documents and instruments that have
been accepted for registration and that have not yet been noted on the
certificate of title for the registered land;

(B) Record in the bureau of conveyances,
pursuant to chapter 502, the written request for deregistration presented to
the assistant registrar for filing or recording. The request shall be recorded
immediately after the certificate or certificates of title; and

(C) Cancel the certificate of title.

(3) The registrar or assistant registrar shall note
the recordation and cancellation of the certificate of title in the
registration book and in the records of the application for registration of the
land that is the subject of the certificate of title. The notation shall state
the bureau of conveyances document number for the certificate of title so
recorded, the certificate of title number, and the land court application
number, map number, and lot number for the land that is the subject of the
certificate of title so recorded.

(4) No order of court shall be required prior to or
in connection with the performance of any of the foregoing actions. [L 2013, c
119, §§2, 13]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next